Maryland, session 2025, HB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–709.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Brownfield” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this title.
– 1 –

Ch. 458 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “Certified SREC” means a solar renewable energy credit generated by
a certified system.
(4) “Certified system” means a solar energy generating system certified by
the Commission under the Program to generate certified SRECs with the compliance value
specified in subsection (c) of this section.
(5) “Program” means the Small Solar Energy Generating System Incentive
Program.
(d) To be eligible for certification under the Program, a solar energy generating
system shall:
(1) be located in the State;
(2) be eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio
standard;
(3) have a generating capacity of 5 megawatts or less, as measured by the
alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(4) be placed in service between July 1, 2024, and January 1, 2028,
inclusive; and
(5) be one of the following types of systems:
(i) a system with a generating capacity of 20 kilowatts or less, as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(ii) a system with a generating capacity of 2 megawatts or less, as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter, if the system is used
for aggregate net metering; or
(iii) a system with a generating capacity of between 20 kilowatts and
5 megawatts, as measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter, if the
system is LOCATED ON OR OVER:
1. located on a rooftop,;
2. a parking canopy, or;
3. a brownfield; OR
2. A FLOATING SYSTEM
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 458
4. A WATER RETENTION POND OR QUARRY CURRENTLY
OR PREVIOUSLY DESIGNATED FOR INDUSTRIAL USE.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the Commission, at the
time of certifying a solar energy generating system as a Tier 1 renewable source, shall
certify the system as eligible to generate certified SRECs in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section if the applicant submits with its application for certification as a Tier 1
renewable source:
(1) a form requesting to be certified to receive certified SRECs with the
value specified in subsection (c) of this section;
(2) a copy of the interconnection agreement between the applicant and the
applicant’s electric company indicating that the size of the system is eligible;
(3) if seeking certification as a system located on or over a roof, parking lot,
[or] parking structure, OR NONNAVIGABLE BODY OF WATER AN AREA SPECIFIED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(5)(III) OF THIS SECTION, a copy of the final approval of the
local building permit;
(4) if seeking certification as a system located on a brownfield,
documentation demonstrating that the system is located on a brownfield;
(5) if seeking certification based on aggregated net metering, a copy of the
aggregated net energy metering rider submitted with the interconnection agreement; and
(6) any other information required by the Commission.
Article – Tax – Property
9–275.
(A) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX
IMPOSED ON A NONRESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
CONSTRUCTED ON A BROWNFIELD OR A WATER RETENTION POND OR QUARRY
CURRENTLY OR PREVIOUSLY DESIGNATED FOR INDUSTRIAL USE.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION;
– 3 –

Ch. 458 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
7–249.
(a) This section applies only to nonresidential solar energy generating systems
that are approved by the Public Service Commission under § 7–207 or § 7–207.1 of the
Public Utilities Article on or after July 1, 2024.
(b) Nonresidential solar energy generating systems that are constructed on the
rooftops of buildings [or on], parking facility canopies, OR BROWNFIELDS, OR THAT ARE
FLOATING SYSTEMS, are not subject to valuation or to property tax.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –